Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1605.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8304(b)(2) of Title 24 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 8304. Creditable nonschool service.* * *(b) Limitations on nonschool service.--Creditable nonschool service credit shall be limited to:* * *(2) Military service other than intervening military service, activated military service or service performed during USERRA leave not exceeding [five] ten years provided that a member with multiple service may not purchase more than a total of [five] ten years of military service in both 1234567891011121314151617181920 the system and the State Employees' Retirement System.* * *Section 2. Section 5304(c)(2)(ii) of Title 71 is amended to read:§ 5304. Creditable nonstate service.* * *(c) Limitations on nonstate service.--Creditable nonstate service credit shall be limited to:* * *(2) * * *(ii) the total creditable nonstate service under this paragraph may not exceed [five] ten years, provided that a member with multiple service may not purchase more than a total of [five] ten years of military service in both the system and the Public School Employees' Retirement System;* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1605PN1921 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718